New York, session 2025-2026, A4755.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 995 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 7-a to read as follows: 3 7-a. "Felony arrestee" means a person arrested and charged with any 4 one or more of the following felonies, or an attempt thereof where such 5 attempt is a felony offense, as defined in sections 130.25, 130.30, 6 130.35, 130.53, 130.65, 130.66, 130.67, 130.70, 130.75, 130.80, 130.95 7 and 130.96 of the penal law, relating to sex offenses; and the victim is 8 less than thirteen years old. 9 § 2. Subdivision 3 of section 995-c of the executive law is amended by 10 adding four new paragraphs (c), (d), (e) and (f) to read as follows: 11 (c) A felony arrestee shall be required to provide a sample appropri- 12 ate for DNA testing upon their arrest, unless such felony arrestee has 13 previously provided a sample that is included in the state DNA identifi- 14 cation index. 15 (d) A public servant to whose custody a designated offender or felony 16 arrestee who has not yet provided a DNA sample has been committed shall 17 seek an order of the court to collect such sample if the offender, after 18 written or oral request, refuses to provide such sample. 19 (e) The detention, arrest, indictment or conviction of a person based 20 upon DNA records contained in the state DNA identification index shall 21 not be invalidated if it is later determined that the division of crimi- 22 nal justice services inadvertently, but in good faith, collected or 23 placed the person's DNA sample in the index. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02452-01-5 A. 4755 2 1 (f) The commissioner of criminal justice services shall promulgate 2 rules and regulations governing the periodic review of the DNA identifi- 3 cation index to determine whether or not the index contains DNA profiles 4 that should not be in the index, including the steps necessary to 5 expunge any profiles which the division of criminal justice services 6 determines should not be in the index. 7 § 3. Subdivision 9 of section 995-c of the executive law, as amended 8 by chapter 524 of the laws of 2002, is amended to read as follows: 9 9. (a) Upon receipt of notification of a reversal or a vacatur of a 10 conviction, or of the granting of a pardon pursuant to article two-A of 11 this chapter, of an individual whose DNA record has been stored in the 12 state DNA identification index in accordance with this article by the 13 division of criminal justice services, the DNA record shall be expunged 14 from the state DNA identification index, and such individual may apply 15 to the court in which the judgment of conviction was originally entered 16 for an order directing the expungement of any DNA record and any 17 samples, analyses, or other documents relating to the DNA testing of 18 such individual in connection with the investigation or prosecution of 19 the crime which resulted in the conviction that was reversed or vacated 20 or for which the pardon was granted. A copy of such application shall be 21 served on the district attorney and an order directing expungement may 22 be granted if the court finds that all appeals relating to the 23 conviction have been concluded; that such individual will not be 24 retried, or, if a retrial has occurred, the trier of fact has rendered a 25 verdict of complete acquittal, and that expungement will not adversely 26 affect the investigation or prosecution of some other person or persons 27 for the crime. The division shall, by rule or regulation, prescribe 28 procedures to ensure that the DNA record in the state DNA identification 29 index, and any samples, analyses, or other documents relating to such 30 record, whether in the possession of the division, or any law enforce- 31 ment or police agency, or any forensic DNA laboratory, including any 32 duplicates or copies thereof, at the discretion of the possessor there- 33 of, are either destroyed or returned to such individual, or to the 34 attorney who represented [him or her] such individual at the time such 35 reversal, vacatur or pardon, was granted. The commissioner shall also 36 adopt by rule and regulation a procedure for the expungement in other 37 appropriate circumstances of DNA records contained in the index. 38 (b) As prescribed in this paragraph, if an individual, either volun- 39 tarily, pursuant to paragraph (c) of subdivision three of this section, 40 or pursuant to a warrant or order of a court, has provided a sample for 41 DNA testing in connection with the investigation, arrest or prosecution 42 of a crime and (i) no criminal action against the individual relating to 43 such crime was commenced within the period specified by section 30.10 of 44 the criminal procedure law, or (ii) a criminal action was commenced 45 against the individual relating to such crime which resulted in a 46 complete acquittal, or (iii) a criminal action was commenced against the 47 individual relating to such crime [resulted in a conviction that was 48 subsequently reversed or vacated, or for which the individual was grant- 49 ed a pardon pursuant to article two-A of this chapter, such individual 50 may apply to the supreme court or the court in which the judgment of 51 conviction was originally entered for an order directing the expungement 52 of any DNA record and any samples, analyses, or other documents relating 53 to the DNA testing of such individual in connection with the investi- 54 gation or prosecution of such crime. A copy of such application shall be 55 served on the district attorney and an order directing expungement may 56 be granted if the court finds that the individual has satisfied the A. 4755 3 1 conditions of one of the subparagraphs of this paragraph; that if a 2 judgment of conviction was reversed or vacated, all appeals relating 3 thereto have been concluded and the individual will not be retried, or, 4 if a retrial has occurred, the trier of fact has rendered a verdict of 5 complete acquittal, and that expungement will not adversely affect the 6 investigation or prosecution of some other person or persons for the 7 crime. If an order directing the expungement of any DNA record and any 8 samples, analyses or other documents relating to the DNA testing of such 9 individual is issued] which was resolved by a dismissal, successful 10 completion of a pre-prosecution diversion program, or conditional 11 discharge or misdemeanor conviction that did not require DNA collection 12 pursuant to section nine hundred ninety-five of this article, the DNA 13 record shall be expunged from the state DNA identification index. An 14 individual may request expungement of any DNA record and any samples, 15 analyses or other documents relating to the DNA testing of such individ- 16 ual by providing the following materials to the division of criminal 17 justice services: 18 (1) a written request for expungement of the sample and DNA records; 19 and 20 (2) a certified copy of the dismissal, successful completion of a 21 pre-prosecution diversion program or a conditional discharge, misdemea- 22 nor conviction or acquittal; and 23 (3) a sworn statement from the district attorney's office with juris- 24 diction over the matter that: the case was dismissed; a pre-prosecution 25 diversion program or conditional discharge, misdemeanor conviction 26 excluded from DNA collection pursuant to section nine hundred ninety- 27 five of this article or acquittal occurred; no felony charges arose out 28 of the arrest; or no criminal action against the individual relating to 29 such crime was commenced within the period specified by section 30.10 of 30 the criminal procedure law; and that expungement will not adversely 31 affect the investigation or prosecution of some other person or persons 32 for the crime. 33 (c) If expungement is warranted pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of 34 this subdivision, such record and any samples, analyses, or other docu- 35 ments shall, at the discretion of the possessor thereof, be destroyed or 36 returned to such individual or to the attorney who represented [him or 37 her] the individual in the criminal action or in connection with the 38 [application for the order of] request for expungement. 39 (d) No expungement shall be granted where an individual has a prior 40 conviction requiring a DNA sample, or a pending felony charge for which 41 collection of a sample is authorized pursuant to the provisions of para- 42 graph (c) of subdivision three of this section. 43 § 4. Subdivision 6 of section 120.90 of the criminal procedure law, as 44 amended by section 16 of part WWW of chapter 59 of the laws of 2017, is 45 amended to read as follows: 46 6. Before bringing a defendant arrested pursuant to a warrant before 47 the local criminal court or youth part of a superior court in which such 48 warrant is returnable, a police officer must without unnecessary delay 49 perform all fingerprinting and other preliminary police duties required 50 in the particular case. In any case in which the defendant is not 51 brought by a police officer before such court but, following [his] their 52 arrest in another county for an offense specified in subdivision one of 53 section 160.10 of this title, is released by a local criminal court of 54 such other county on [his] their own recognizance or on bail for [his] 55 their appearance on a specified date before the local criminal court 56 before which the warrant is returnable, the latter court must, upon A. 4755 4 1 arraignment of the defendant before it, direct that [he be] they are 2 fingerprinted and have a sample appropriate for DNA testing taken, if 3 required pursuant to section nine hundred ninety-five-c of the executive 4 law, by the appropriate officer or agency, and that [he] they appear at 5 an appropriate designated time and place for such purpose. 6 § 5. Section 130.60 of the criminal procedure law, as amended by chap- 7 ter 95 of the laws of 1991, subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 446 of 8 the laws of 1993, is amended to read as follows: 9 § 130.60 Summons; fingerprinting of defendant. 10 1. Upon the arraignment of a defendant whose court attendance has been 11 secured by the issuance and service of a summons, based upon an indict- 12 ment, a prosecutor's information or upon an information, felony 13 complaint or misdemeanor complaint filed by a complainant who is a 14 police officer, the court must, if an offense charged in the accusatory 15 instrument is one specified in subdivision one of section 160.10 of this 16 title, direct that the defendant be fingerprinted by the appropriate 17 police officer or agency, and that [he or she] they appear at an appro- 18 priate designated time and place for such purpose. If an offense charged 19 in the accusatory instrument is one specified in subdivision seven-a of 20 section nine hundred ninety-five of the executive law, the court must 21 direct that a sample appropriate for DNA testing be taken, and that they 22 appear at an appropriate designated time and place for such purpose. 23 2. Upon the arraignment of a defendant whose court attendance has been 24 secured by the issuance and service of a summons based upon an informa- 25 tion or misdemeanor complaint filed by a complainant who is not a police 26 officer, and who has not previously been fingerprinted or from whom a 27 DNA sample has not previously been taken and was required pursuant to 28 section nine hundred ninety-five-c of the executive law, the court may, 29 if it finds reasonable cause to believe that the defendant has committed 30 an offense specified in subdivision one of section 160.10 of this title, 31 direct that the defendant be fingerprinted and/or have a sample appro- 32 priate for DNA testing taken, if required by section nine hundred nine- 33 ty-five-c of the executive law, by the appropriate police officer or 34 agency and that [he] they appear at an appropriate designated time and 35 place for such purpose. A defendant whose court appearance has been 36 secured by the issuance and service of a criminal summons based upon a 37 misdemeanor complaint or information filed by a complainant who is not a 38 police officer, must be directed by the court, upon conviction of the 39 defendant, to be fingerprinted and have a sample appropriate for DNA 40 testing taken, if required by section nine hundred ninety-five-c of the 41 executive law, by the appropriate police officer or agency and the court 42 must also direct that the defendant appear at an appropriate designated 43 time and place for such purpose, if the defendant is convicted of any 44 offense specified in subdivision one of section 160.10 of this title. 45 § 6. Subdivision 5 of section 140.20 of the criminal procedure law, as 46 amended by chapter 762 of the laws of 1971, is amended to read as 47 follows: 48 5. Before service of an appearance ticket upon an arrested person 49 pursuant to subdivision two or three of this section, the issuing police 50 officer must, if the offense designated in such appearance ticket is one 51 of those specified in subdivision one of section 160.10 of this title, 52 cause such person to be fingerprinted and have a sample appropriate for 53 DNA testing taken, if required by section nine hundred ninety-five-c of 54 the executive law, in the same manner as would be required were no 55 appearance ticket to be issued or served. A. 4755 5 1 § 7. Subdivision 2 of section 140.27 of the criminal procedure law, as 2 amended by section 21 of part WWW of chapter 59 of the laws of 2017, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 2. Upon arresting a person without a warrant, a peace officer, except 5 as otherwise provided in subdivision three or three-a of this section, 6 must without unnecessary delay bring [him] or cause [him] such person to 7 be brought before a local criminal court, as provided in section 100.55 8 and subdivision one of section 140.20 of this title, and must without 9 unnecessary delay file or cause to be filed therewith an appropriate 10 accusatory instrument. If the offense which is the subject of the arrest 11 is one of those specified in subdivision one of section 160.10 of this 12 title, the arrested person must be fingerprinted and photographed, and 13 have a sample appropriate for DNA testing taken if required by section 14 nine hundred ninety-five-c of the executive law, as therein provided. In 15 order to execute the required post-arrest functions, such arresting 16 peace officer may perform such functions [himself] themselves or [he] 17 they may enlist the aid of a police officer for the performance thereof 18 in the manner provided in subdivision one of section 140.20 of this 19 article. 20 § 8. Section 150.70 of the criminal procedure law, as amended by chap- 21 ter 762 of the laws of 1971, is amended to read as follows: 22 § 150.70 Appearance ticket; fingerprinting and DNA analysis sample of 23 defendant. 24 Upon the arraignment of a defendant who has not been arrested and 25 whose court attendance has been secured by the issuance and service of 26 an appearance ticket pursuant to subdivision one of section 150.20 of 27 this article, the court must, if an offense charged in the accusatory 28 instrument is one specified in subdivision one of section 160.10 of this 29 title, direct that the defendant be fingerprinted and have a sample 30 appropriate for DNA testing taken when required by section nine hundred 31 ninety-five-c of the executive law by the appropriate police officer or 32 agency, and that [he] they appear at an appropriate designated time and 33 place for such purpose. 34 § 9. Section 160.20 of the criminal procedure law, as amended by chap- 35 ter 108 of the laws of 1973, is amended to read as follows: 36 § 160.20 Fingerprinting and DNA analysis sample; forwarding of finger- 37 prints and DNA analysis sample. 38 1. Upon the taking of fingerprints of an arrested person or defendant 39 as prescribed in section 160.10 of this article, the appropriate police 40 officer or agency must without unnecessary delay forward two copies of 41 such fingerprints to the division of criminal justice services. 42 2. Upon taking a sample appropriate for DNA testing, the appropriate 43 police office or agency must without unnecessary delay store and forward 44 such DNA sample to a forensic DNA laboratory for forensic DNA testing 45 and analyses, and inclusion in the state DNA identification index in 46 accordance with subdivision five of section nine hundred ninety-five-c 47 of the executive law. 48 § 10. Paragraphs (d) and (e) of subdivision 1 of section 160.50 of the 49 criminal procedure law, paragraph (d) as amended by chapter 449 of the 50 laws of 2015 and paragraph (e) as amended by chapter 169 of the laws of 51 1994, are amended and a new paragraph (f) is added to read as follows: 52 (d) such records shall be made available to the person accused or to 53 such person's designated agent, and shall be made available to (i) a 54 prosecutor in any proceeding in which the accused has moved for an order 55 pursuant to section 170.56 or 210.46 of this [chapter] part, or (ii) a 56 law enforcement agency upon ex parte motion in any superior court, or in A. 4755 6 1 any district court, city court or the criminal court of the city of New 2 York provided that such court sealed the record, if such agency demon- 3 strates to the satisfaction of the court that justice requires that such 4 records be made available to it, or (iii) any state or local officer or 5 agency with responsibility for the issuance of licenses to possess guns, 6 when the accused has made application for such a license, or (iv) the 7 New York state department of corrections and community supervision when 8 the accused is on parole supervision as a result of conditional release 9 or a parole release granted by the New York state board of parole, and 10 the arrest which is the subject of the inquiry is one which occurred 11 while the accused was under such supervision, or (v) any prospective 12 employer of a police officer or peace officer as those terms are defined 13 in subdivisions thirty-three and thirty-four of section 1.20 of this 14 chapter, in relation to an application for employment as a police offi- 15 cer or peace officer; provided, however, that every person who is an 16 applicant for the position of police officer or peace officer shall be 17 furnished with a copy of all records obtained under this paragraph and 18 afforded an opportunity to make an explanation thereto, or (vi) the 19 probation department responsible for supervision of the accused when the 20 arrest which is the subject of the inquiry is one which occurred while 21 the accused was under such supervision; [and] 22 (e) where fingerprints subject to the provisions of this section have 23 been received by the division of criminal justice services and have been 24 filed by the division as digital images, such images may be retained, 25 provided that a fingerprint card of the individual is on file with the 26 division which was not sealed pursuant to this section or section 160.55 27 of this article[.]; and 28 (f) a sample appropriate for DNA testing taken from such person pursu- 29 ant to section nine hundred ninety-five-c of the executive law, and any 30 DNA record relating to such sample, and any analyses or other documents 31 relating to such DNA sample shall be expunged, destroyed or returned in 32 accordance with subdivision nine of such section of the executive law. 33 § 11. Paragraphs (d) and (e) of subdivision 1 of section 160.55 of the 34 criminal procedure law, paragraph (d) as amended by chapter 449 of the 35 laws of 2015 and paragraph (e) as amended by chapter 169 of the laws of 36 1994, are amended and a new paragraph (f) is added to read as follows: 37 (d) the records referred to in paragraph (c) of this subdivision shall 38 be made available to the person accused or to such person's designated 39 agent, and shall be made available to (i) a prosecutor in any proceeding 40 in which the accused has moved for an order pursuant to section 170.56 41 or 210.46 of this [chapter] part, or (ii) a law enforcement agency upon 42 ex parte motion in any superior court, or in any district court, city 43 court or the criminal court of the city of New York provided that such 44 court sealed the record, if such agency demonstrates to the satisfaction 45 of the court that justice requires that such records be made available 46 to it, or (iii) any state or local officer or agency with responsibility 47 for the issuance of licenses to possess guns, when the accused has made 48 application for such a license, or (iv) the New York state department of 49 corrections and community supervision when the accused is under parole 50 supervision as a result of conditional release or parole release granted 51 by the New York state board of parole and the arrest which is the 52 subject of the inquiry is one which occurred while the accused was under 53 such supervision, or (v) the probation department responsible for super- 54 vision of the accused when the arrest which is the subject of the 55 inquiry is one which occurred while the accused was under such super- 56 vision, or (vi) a police agency, probation department, sheriff's office, A. 4755 7 1 district attorney's office, department of correction of any municipality 2 and parole department, for law enforcement purposes, upon arrest in 3 instances in which the individual stands convicted of harassment in the 4 second degree, as defined in section 240.26 of the penal law, committed 5 against a member of the same family or household as the defendant, as 6 defined in subdivision one of section 530.11 of this chapter, and deter- 7 mined pursuant to subdivision eight-a of section 170.10 of this title; 8 [and] 9 (e) where fingerprints subject to the provisions of this section have 10 been received by the division of criminal justice services and have been 11 filed by the division as digital images, such images may be retained, 12 provided that a fingerprint card of the individual is on file with the 13 division which was not sealed pursuant to this section or section 160.50 14 of this article[.]; and 15 (f) a sample appropriate for DNA testing taken from such person pursu- 16 ant to section nine hundred ninety-five-c of the executive law, any DNA 17 record relating to such sample, and any analyses or other documents 18 relating to such DNA sample shall be expunged, destroyed or returned in 19 accordance with subdivision nine of such section of the executive law. 20 § 12. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day 21 after it shall have become a law.